Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1077.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-705, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-705. Dangerous crimes against children; sentences; definitions A. A person who is at least eighteen years of age and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving commercial sexual exploitation of a minor or child sex trafficking and the person has previously been convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree shall be sentenced to imprisonment in the custody of the state department of corrections for natural life. A person who is sentenced to natural life is not eligible for commutation, parole, work furlough, work release or release from confinement on any basis for the remainder of the person's natural life. B. A person who is at least eighteen years of age and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving sexual assault of a minor who is twelve years of age or younger or sexual conduct with a minor who is twelve years of age or younger shall be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. This subsection does not apply to masturbatory contact. C. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving attempted first degree murder of a minor who is under twelve years of age, sexual assault of a minor who is under twelve years of age, sexual conduct with a minor who is under twelve years of age or manufacturing methamphetamine under circumstances that cause physical injury to a minor who is under twelve years of age may be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. If a life sentence is not imposed pursuant to this subsection, the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 13 years                20 years                27 years D. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving second degree murder of a minor who is under fifteen years of age may be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. If a life sentence is not imposed pursuant to this subsection, the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 25 years                30 years                35 years E. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving attempted first degree murder of a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age, sexual assault of a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age, taking a child for the purpose of prostitution, child sex trafficking, Unlawful use of interactive computer service for the purpose of facilitating, promoting or soliciting prostitution, commercial sexual exploitation of a minor sexual conduct with a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age, manufacturing methamphetamine under circumstances that cause physical injury to a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age or involving or using minors in drug offenses shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 13 years                20 years                27 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 23 years                30 years                37 years F. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving aggravated assault, unlawful mutilation, molestation of a child, sexual exploitation of a minor, aggravated luring a minor for sexual exploitation, child abuse or kidnapping shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 10 years                17 years                24 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 21 years                28 years                35 years G. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a person is at least eighteen years of age or has been tried as an adult and is convicted of a dangerous crime against children involving luring a minor for sexual exploitation, sexual extortion or unlawful age misrepresentation and is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the term of imprisonment is as follows and the person is not eligible for release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served or is commuted, except that if the person is convicted of unlawful age misrepresentation the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 5 years                 10 years                15 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows and the person is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served or is commuted, except that if the person is convicted of unlawful age misrepresentation the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 8 years                 15 years                22 years H. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a person is at least eighteen years of age or has been tried as an adult and is convicted of a dangerous crime against children involving sexual abuse or bestiality under section 13-1411, subsection A, paragraph 2 and is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the term of imprisonment is as follows and the person is not eligible for release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 2.5 years               5 years                 7.5 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows and the person is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 8 years                 15 years                22 years I. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving continuous sexual abuse of a child shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 39 years                60 years                81 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 69 years                90 years                111 years J. The presumptive sentences prescribed in subsections C, D, E, F and I of this section or subsections G and H of this section if the person has previously been convicted of a predicate felony may be increased or decreased pursuant to section 13-701, subsections C, D and E. K. Except as provided in subsections G, H, M and N of this section, a person who is sentenced for a dangerous crime against children in the first degree pursuant to this section is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served or commuted. L. A person who is convicted of any dangerous crime against children in the first degree pursuant to subsection C, D, E, F or I of this section and who has been previously convicted of two or more predicate felonies shall be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served not fewer than thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. M. Notwithstanding chapter 10 of this title, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the second degree pursuant to subsection B, C, E, F or I of this section is guilty of a class 3 felony and if the person is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the term of imprisonment is as follows and the person is not eligible for release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served the sentence imposed by the court, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 5 years                 10 years                15 years N. A person who is convicted of any dangerous crime against children in the second degree and who has been previously convicted of one or more predicate felonies is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. O. Section 13-704, subsection J and section 13-707, subsection B apply to the determination of prior convictions. P. The sentence imposed on a person by the court for a dangerous crime against children under subsection H of this section involving sexual abuse may be served concurrently with other sentences if the offense involved only one victim. The sentence imposed on a person for any other dangerous crime against children in the first or second degree shall be consecutive to any other sentence imposed on the person at any time, including sexual abuse of the same victim. Q. In this section, for purposes of punishment an unborn child shall be treated like a minor who is under twelve years of age. R. A dangerous crime against children is in the first degree if it is a completed offense and is in the second degree if it is a preparatory offense, except attempted first degree murder is a dangerous crime against children in the first degree. S. It is not a defense to a dangerous crime against children that the minor is a person posing as a minor or is otherwise fictitious if the defendant knew or had reason to know the purported minor was under fifteen years of age. T. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Dangerous crime against children": (a) Means any of the following that is committed against a minor who is under fifteen years of age or against a person posing as a minor if the defendant knew or had reason to know that the purported minor was under fifteen years of age: (i) Second degree murder. (ii) Aggravated assault resulting in serious physical injury or involving the discharge, use or threatening exhibition of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument. (iii) Sexual assault. (iv) Molestation of a child. (v) Sexual conduct with a minor. (vi) Commercial sexual exploitation of a minor. (vii) Sexual exploitation of a minor. (viii) Child abuse as prescribed in section 13-3623, subsection A, paragraph 1. (ix) Kidnapping. (x) Sexual abuse. (xi) Taking a child for the purpose of prostitution as prescribed in section 13-3206. (xii) Child sex trafficking as prescribed in section 13-3212. (xiii) Involving or using minors in drug offenses. (xiv) Continuous sexual abuse of a child. (xv) Attempted first degree murder. (xvi) Sex trafficking. (xvii) Manufacturing methamphetamine under circumstances that cause physical injury to a minor. (xviii) Bestiality as prescribed in section 13-1411, subsection A, paragraph 2. (xix) Luring a minor for sexual exploitation. (xx) Aggravated luring a minor for sexual exploitation. (xxi) Unlawful age misrepresentation. (xxii) Unlawful mutilation. (xxiii) Sexual extortion as prescribed in section 13-1428. (xxiv) Unlawful use of interactive computer service for purpose of facilitating, promoting or soliciting prostitution as prescribed in section 13-3213, subsection B. (b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), items (vi) and (vii) of this paragraph, includes a visual depiction that is indistinguishable from an actual minor who is under fifteen years of age. 2. "Predicate felony" means any felony involving child abuse pursuant to section 13-3623, subsection A, paragraph 1, a sexual offense, conduct involving the intentional or knowing infliction of serious physical injury or the discharge, use or threatening exhibition of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument, or a dangerous crime against children in the first or second degree. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 13, chapter 32, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-3213, to read: START_STATUTE13-3213. Unlawful use of interactive computer service for purpose of facilitating, promoting or soliciting prostitution; classification; definitions A. A person or agent of an enterprise who knowingly controls, keeps, maintains, manages, operates or owns an interactive computer service or information content provider in this state for the primary purpose of facilitating, promoting or soliciting prostitution pursuant to section 13-3214, pandering pursuant to section 13-3209 or CHILD SEX TRAFFICKING PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION 13-3212 involving a minor who is fifteen, sixteen or seventeen years of age is guilty of a class 5 felony. B. A person or agent of an enterprise who violates subsection A of this section and who has direct knowledge of the occurrence of CHILD SEX TRAFFICKING involving a minor who is under fifteen years of age is guilty of a class 2 felony and is punishable pursuant to section 13-705. C. A person or agent of an enterprise who violates subsection A or b of this section and who knowingly exposes sexual material that is harmful to minors without using reasonable age verification methods prescribed by section 18-701 to verify that an individual who attempts to access the material is eighteen years of age or older is guilty of a class 4 felony, d. It is a violation of this section for a person or agent of an enterprise to receive, agree to receive or solicit any benefit, including SERVICE fees, IF the person or agent has actual knowledge that the specific benefit is derived from the facilitation of an offense listed in subsection A of this section. E. it is a defense to a prosecution under of this section if a person or agent of an enterprise is a law enforcement officer who is acting in the officer's official capacity within the scope of the officer's authority and in the line of duty. F. It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section that A person or agent of an enterprise does not know the minor is under eighteen years of age. G. for the purposes of this section: 1. "Agent" means an officer, director or employee of an enterprise or any other person who is authorized to act on behalf of the enterprise. 2. "Information content provider" means a person or entity that is responsible, in whole or in part, for creating or developing information that is provided through the Internet or any other interactive computer service. 3. "Interactive Computer Service": (a) means an information service, system or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including a service or system that provides access to the Internet and systems or services that are operated or offered by libraries or educational institutions. (b) does not include a service that is primarily engaged in general purpose search indexing, cloud computing or providing advertising services to the general public, cable, video or broadband internet access services or telecommunications services, unless the service is specifically marketed for the promotion of illegal acts of prostitution. 4. "Internet" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-2671. 5. "Service fees" means the costs that are associated with obtaining a profile or posting advertisements. 6. "Sexual material that is harmful to minors" has the same meaning prescribed in section 18-701. END_STATUTE